Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 14
IDAHO INSPECTION OF BRANDS

Sec.

§ 25-1401. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1402. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1402A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1403. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1404. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1405. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1406. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1407. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1408. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1409. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1410. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1411. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1412. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1413. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1414. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1415. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 25-1416. Transfer of title for livestock. [Repealed.]

§ 25-1416a — 25-1416c. [Repealed.]